Wisconsin, session 2025, SB74.
do enact as follows:SB74,11Section 1. 14.898 of the statutes is created to read:SB74,2,7214.898 Social work licensure compact. There is created a social work 3licensure compact commission as specified in s. 457.70. The delegate on the 4commission representing this state shall be appointed by the marriage and family 5therapy, professional counseling, and social work examining board as provided in s. 6457.70 (10) (b) 1. and shall be an individual described in s. 457.70 (10) (b) 2. a. or b. 7The commission has the powers and duties granted and imposed under s. 457.70.SB74,28Section 2. 46.90 (4) (ab) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,2,12946.90 (4) (ab) 4. A social worker, professional counselor, or marriage and 10family therapist certified under, as those terms are defined in subch. I of ch. 457 or 11a professional counselor who is exercising the privilege to practice, as defined in s. 12457.50 (2) (s), in this state.SB74,313Section 3. 48.56 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,2,171448.56 (2) Each county department shall employ personnel who devote all or 15part of their time to child welfare services. Whenever possible, these personnel 16shall be social workers certified under subch. I of ch. 457, as defined in s. 457.01 17(10).SB74,418Section 4. 48.561 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,3,31948.561 (2) The department shall employ personnel in a county having a 1population of 750,000 or more who devote all of their time directly or indirectly to 2child welfare services. Whenever possible, these personnel shall be social workers 3certified under subch. I of ch. 457, as defined in s. 457.01 (10).SB74,54Section 5. 49.45 (30j) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,3,21549.45 (30j) (a) 1. “Competent mental health professional” means a physician 6who has completed a residence in psychiatry; a psychologist; a private practice 7school psychologist who is licensed under ch. 455; a marriage and family therapist 8who is licensed under s. 457.10 or 457.11; a professional counselor who is licensed 9under s. 457.12 or 457.13 or who is exercising the professional counselor privilege to 10practice, as defined in s. 457.50 (2) (s) 457.01 (7), in this state; an advanced practice 11social worker who holds a certificate under s. 457.08 (2), as defined in s. 457.01 (1c); 12an independent social worker who holds a certificate under s. 457.08 (3), as defined 13in s. 457.01 (2g); a clinical social worker who is licensed under s. 457.08 (4), as 14defined in s. 457.01 (1r); a clinical substance abuse counselor or independent 15clinical supervisor who is certified under s. 440.88, or any of these individuals who 16is practicing under a currently valid training or temporary license or certificate 17granted under applicable provisions of ch. 457. “Competent mental health 18professional” does not include an individual whose license, certificate, or privilege is 19suspended, revoked, or voluntarily surrendered, or whose license, certificate, or 20privilege is limited or restricted, when practicing in areas prohibited by the 21limitation or restriction.SB74,622Section 6. 51.03 (6) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,4,142351.03 (6) (a) In this subsection, “licensed treatment professional” means a 24physician who has completed a residence in psychiatry; a psychologist; a private 1practice school psychologist who is licensed under ch. 455; a marriage and family 2therapist who is licensed under s. 457.10 or 457.11, as defined in s. 457.01 (3); a 3professional counselor who is licensed under s. 457.12 or 457.13 or who is exercising 4the professional counselor privilege to practice, as defined in s. 457.50 (2) (s), in this 5state, as defined in s. 457.01 (7); an advanced practice social worker who holds a 6certificate under s. 457.08 (2), as defined in s. 457.01 (1c); an independent social 7worker who is licensed under s. 457.08 (3), as defined in s. 457.01 (2g); a clinical 8social worker who is licensed under s. 457.08 (4), as defined in s. 457.01 (1r); or any 9of these individuals who is practicing under a currently valid training or temporary 10license or certificate granted under applicable provisions of ch. 457. “Licensed 11treatment professional” does not include an individual whose license, certificate, or 12privilege is suspended, revoked, or voluntarily surrendered, or whose license, 13certificate, or privilege is limited or restricted, when practicing in areas prohibited 14by the limitation or restriction.SB74,715Section 7. 55.043 (1m) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,4,191655.043 (1m) (a) 4. A social worker, professional counselor, or marriage and 17family therapist certified under, as those terms are defined in subch. I of ch. 457 or 18a professional counselor who is exercising the privilege to practice, as defined in s. 19457.50 (2) (s), in this state.SB74,820Section 8. 146.81 (1) (hg) of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,4,2421146.81 (1) (hg) A social worker, marriage and family therapist, or professional 22counselor certified or licensed under, as those terms are defined in subch. I of ch. 23457 or a professional counselor who is exercising the privilege to practice, as defined 24in s. 457.50 (2) (s), in this state.SB74,91Section 9. 146.89 (1) (r) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,5,32146.89 (1) (r) 6. A social worker who holds a certificate granted under subch. 3I of ch. 457, as defined in s. 457.01 (10).SB74,104Section 10. 146.89 (1) (r) 7. of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,5,75146.89 (1) (r) 7. A marriage and family therapist who is licensed under subch. 6I of ch. 457, as defined in s. 457.01 (3) or a professional counselor who is licensed 7under subch. I of ch. 457, as defined in s. 457.01 (7).SB74,118Section 11. 146.997 (1) (d) 11. of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,5,129146.997 (1) (d) 11. A social worker, marriage and family therapist or 10professional counselor certified under, as those terms are defined in subch. I of ch. 11457 or a professional counselor who is exercising the privilege to practice, as defined 12in s. 457.50 (2) (s), in this state.SB74,1213Section 12. 252.14 (1) (ar) 7. of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,5,1714252.14 (1) (ar) 7. A social worker, marriage and family therapist, or 15professional counselor certified or licensed under, as those terms are defined in 16subch. I of ch. 457 or a professional counselor who is exercising the privilege to 17practice, as defined in s. 457.50 (2) (s), in this state.SB74,1318Section 13. 252.15 (1) (er) of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,5,2219252.15 (1) (er) “Social worker” means an individual who is certified or 20licensed as a social worker, advanced practice social worker, independent social 21worker, or clinical social worker under, as those terms are defined in subch. I of ch. 22457.SB74,1423Section 14. 253.10 (2) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,6,424253.10 (2) (f) “Qualified person assisting the physician” means a social worker 1certified under subch. I of ch. 457, as defined in s. 457.01 (10), a registered nurse or 2a physician assistant to whom a physician who is to perform or induce an abortion 3has delegated the responsibility, as the physician’s agent, for providing the 4information required under sub. (3) (c) 2.SB74,155Section 15. 303.08 (1) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,6,126303.08 (1) (f) Obtaining counseling or therapy from an approved public 7treatment facility, as defined in s. 51.45 (2) (c), an approved private treatment 8facility, as defined in s. 51.45 (2) (b), a psychiatrist, a psychologist, a licensed 9clinical social worker, as defined in s. 457.01 (1r), a professional counselor, as 10defined in s. 457.01 (7), or a certified an independent social worker, as defined in s. 11457.01 (2g), or an advanced practice social worker, as defined in s. 457.01 (1c), who 12is authorized to practice psychotherapy under subch. I of ch. 457.SB74,1613Section 16. 440.03 (11m) (c) 2v. of the statutes is created to read:SB74,6,1514440.03 (11m) (c) 2v. The coordinated data system under s. 457.70 (11), if such 15disclosure is required under the social work licensure compact under s. 457.70.SB74,1716Section 17. 440.03 (13) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,7,217440.03 (13) (b) (intro.) The department may investigate whether an applicant 18for or holder of any of the following credentials has been charged with or convicted 19of a crime only pursuant to rules promulgated by the department under this 20paragraph, including rules that establish the criteria that the department will use 21to determine whether an investigation under this paragraph is necessary, except as 22provided in par. (c) and ss. 441.51 (5) (a) 5., 447.50 (3) (a) 5., 448.980 (5) (b) 3., 23448.985 (3) (a) 4., 448.987 (3) (a) 5. a. and (5) (b) 2. a., 448.988 (3) (a) 5., 455.50 (3) (e) 14. and (f) 4., 457.50 (3) (b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., 457.70 (3) (b) 4. and (7) (b) 3., and 2459.70 (3) (b) 2.:SB74,183Section 18. 440.03 (13) (c) 1. id. of the statutes is created to read:SB74,7,64440.03 (13) (c) 1. id. An applicant for any category of social worker multistate 5license under s. 457.08 (4m) when required pursuant to the social work licensure 6compact under s. 457.70.SB74,197Section 19. 440.15 of the statutes is amended to read:SB74,7,158440.15 No fingerprinting. Except as provided under ss. 440.03 (13) (c), 9441.51 (5) (a) 5., 447.50 (3) (a) 5., 448.980 (5) (b) 3., 448.985 (3) (a) 4., 448.987 (3) (a) 105. a. and (5) (b) 2. a., 448.988 (3) (a) 5., 450.071 (3) (c) 9., 450.075 (3) (c) 9., 455.50 (3) 11(e) 4. and (f) 4., 457.50 (3) (b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., 457.70 (3) (b) 4. and (7) (b) 3., and 12459.70 (3) (b) 1., the department or a credentialing board may not require that an 13applicant for a credential or a credential holder be fingerprinted or submit 14fingerprints in connection with the department’s or the credentialing board’s 15credentialing.SB74,2016Section 20. 446.01 (1v) (m) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb74 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb74 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB74 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB74 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB74: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting